New Mexico, session 2026, HB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three million dollars ($3,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the science, technology, engineering and mathematics innovation network. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233227.1